District of Columbia statutes.
32-1531

Employer record of injury or death.

Every employer shall keep a record with respect of any injury to an employee. Such record shall contain such information of disease, other disability, or death in respect of such injury as the Mayor may by regulation require, and shall be available for inspection by an authorized representative of the Mayor or of any agency of the government of the District of Columbia at such times and under such conditions as the Mayor may by regulation prescribe.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 32, 27 DCR 2503
1981 Ed., § 36-331.